Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3738
Commercial channels, defined.

Commercial channels shall mean the sale of dry beans for any use to any commercial buyer, dealer, processor, or cooperative or to any person who resells such dry beans or any product produced from such dry beans.

Laws 1987, LB 145, § 4.